firefox-addon/dictionaries/tr.dic
alevlenmek/≕
alıvermek/≕
arazileşmek/≕
aşermek/≕
bakmayıvermek/≕
bakıvermek/≕
becelleşmek/≕
becermek/≕
bekinmek/≕
bekitmek/≕
belermek/≕
beletmek/≕
belirmek/≕
belirtmek/≕
beneklenmek/≕
benimsetmek/≕
benlenmek/≕
benzetmek/≕
benzeşmek/≕
bereketlenmek/≕
berelenmek/≕
berkinmek/≕
berkitmek/≕
bertmek/≕
bezilmek/≕
bezmek/≕
beğenmek/≕
bildirişmek/≕
bildirmek/≕
bileşmek/≕
bilgilenmek/≕
bilinçlenmek/≕
bilişmek/≕
bilmek/≕
bindirmek/≕
binişmek/≕
binmek/≕
birikişmek/≕
birikmek/≕
birleşmek/≕
bitirmek/≕
bitişmek/≕
bitlenmek/≕
bitmek/≕
biçmek/≕
bulabilmek/≕
böbürlenmek/≕
böceklenmek/≕
böcelenmek/≕
büyüklenmek/≕
cedelleşmek/≕
cerahatlenmek/≕
cesaretlenmek/≕
cezbelenmek/≕
cilvelenmek/≕
cilveleşmek/≕
cinlenmek/≕
cisimlenmek/≕
cisimleşmek/≕
cücüklenmek/≕
cüretlenmek/≕
debelenmek/≕
dedirmek/≕
dehşetlenmek/≕
delepmek/≕
delilenmek/≕
delirmek/≕
delmek/≕
denetmek/≕
densizlenmek/≕
denşirmek/≕
deprenmek/≕
depreşmek/≕
derdirtmek/≕
derişmek/≕
dermek/≕
dertlenmek/≕
dertleşmek/≕
devinmek/≕
devirmek/≕
devitmek/≕
devşirmek/≕
deyivermek/≕
değdirmek/≕
değerlendirmek/≕
değerlenmek/≕
değil/≕
değinmek/≕
değirmek/≕
değişmek/≕
değişmek/≕
değmek/≕
deşmek/≕
didinmek/≕
didişmek/≕
dijitalleşmek/≕
dijitalleştirmek/≕
dikelmek/≕
dikilmek/≕
diklenmek/≕
dikmek/≕
dilenmek/≕
dilinmek/≕
dillenmek/≕
dilmek/≕
dilsizleşmek/≕
dincelmek/≕
dindirmek/≕
dinelmek/≕
dinlenmek/≕
dinmek/≕
direnmek/≕
diretmek/≕
direşmek/≕
dirilmek/≕
dizmek/≕
dönelmek/≕
dönenmek/≕
düzelmek/≕
düzeltmek/≕
düşgelmek/≕
düşümdeşmek/≕
edeplenmek/≕
edinmek/≕
efelenmek/≕
ekmek/≕⊎⊏⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕
eksilmek/≕
ekşitmek/≕
elenmek/≕
eleştirmek/≕
elmek/≕⊎⊏⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕
elvermek/≕
emişmek/≕
emzirmek/≕
endişelenmek/≕
ergitmek/≕
eritmek/≕
erkeklenmek/≕
eseflenmek/≕
esindirmek/≕
esmek/≕
evermek/≕
evirmek/≕
evrilmek/≕
eğilmek/≕
eğirmek/≕
eğlenmek/≕
eğmek/≕
eğritmek/≕
eşmek/≕
ferdileştirilmek/≕
filtrelenmek/≕
gayretlenmek/≕
gecikmek/≕
gedmek/≕
geliştirmek/≕
gencelmek/≕
genleşmek/≕
gerekmek/≕
gerinmek/≕
getirmek/≕
gevmek/≕
gezinmek/≕
geçinmek/≕
geçişmek/≕
geçmek/≕
gicişmek/≕
gidişmek/≕
girmek/≕
giymek/≕
gölermek/≕
gönenmek/≕
görevlenmek/≕
göstermek/≕
gövermek/≕
göçermek/≕
gücenmek/≕
güreşmek/≕
güvenmek/≕
haberleşmek/≕
halellenmek/≕
halleşmek/≕
hareketlenmek/≕
hasetlenmek/≕
heveslenmek/≕
hislenmek/≕
ikileşmek/≕
ilenmek/≕
ilgilenmek/≕
ilmek/≕⊎⊏⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕
incelmek/≕
incitmek/≕
inmek/≕
irinlenmek/≕
irkmek/≕
itişmek/≕
itmek/≕
ivmek/≕
içermek/≕
içitmek/≕
içmek/≕
işitmek/≕
işlevlendirmek/≕
kabullenmek/≕
kardeşlenmek/≕
kaydileşmek/≕
kederlenmek/≕
kepeklenmek/≕
kertmek/≕
kesinmek/≕
keskenmek/≕
keyiflenmek/≕
kibirlenmek/≕
kimliklendirmek/≕
kirlenmek/≕
kolonileşmek/≕
koyvermek/≕
kökenlenmek/≕
köprülenmek/≕
körelmek/≕
kütletmek/≕
kıymetlenmek/≕
lüpletmek/≕
merceklenmek/≕
mevzilenmek/≕
millenmek/≕
nasiplenmek/≕
neticelenmek/≕
nihayetlenmek/≕
nitelenmek/≕
olagelmek/≕
pekitmek/≕
peltelenmek/≕
peşrevlenmek/≕
pislenmek/≕
pişmek/≕
pürtüklenmek/≕
pürüzlenmek/≕
refetmek/≕
rutubetlenmek/≕
salıvermek/≕
sekmek/≕
sekülerleşmek/≕
sendeletmek/≕
serpiştirmek/≕
sertelmek/≕
seslenmek/≕
sevişmek/≕
seyirtmek/≕
sezinmek/≕
seçilmek/≕
seğirmek/≕
siftinmek/≕
sikmek/≕
silkinmek/≕
silmek/≕
sineklenmek/≕
sinmek/≕
siperlenmek/≕
sislenmek/≕
sivrilmek/≕
siymek/≕
söyleşmek/≕
sözleşmek/≕
süratlenmek/≕
süreklenmek/≕
taharetlenmek/≕
temellenmek/≕
tepişmek/≕
tepsermek/≕
tescillenmek/≕
tiftiklenmek/≕
tirfillenmek/≕
titizlenmek/≕
titreşmek/≕
tökezmek/≕
tüketmek/≕
türleşmek/≕
ufunetlenmek/≕
vazgeçmek/≕
vermek/≕
yedmek/≕
yelmek/≕
yemişlenmek/≕
yenmek/≕
yerinmek/≕
yermek/≕
yetirmek/≕
yetmek/≕
yeşillenmek/≕
yitmek/≕
yönelmek/≕
yönetmek/≕
yücelmek/≕
yükseltmek/≕
yüreklenmek/≕
zevklenmek/≕
zümrütlenmek/≕
çekimsenmek/≕
çekirdeklenmek/≕
çekiştirmek/≕
çelişmek/≕
çemkirmek/≕
çentmek/≕
çerezlenmek/≕
çevrinmek/≕
çillenmek/≕
çimlenmek/≕
çitişmek/≕
çivmek/≕
çiziktirmek/≕
çiğnetmek/≕
çökermek/≕
çöplenmek/≕
çıkagelmek/≕
ödüllendirmek/≕
ölçeklenmek/≕
önemsetmek/≕
örgenleşmek/≕
özenmek/≕
özümletmek/≕
öğretmek/≕
ünlenmek/≕
ürpermek/≕
üstenmek/≕
üveymek/≕
şekillenmek/≕
şenlenmek/≕
şiddetlenmek/≕
şişinmek/≕
şişmek/≕
şüphelenmek/≕
